Washington statutes.
RCW 19.05.090

Labor and industries—Enforcement of amounts due.

(1) Employers may not impermissibly withhold any amounts due to the employee related to the employer's obligations under RCW 19.05.030. If any employee files a complaint with the department alleging that the employer impermissibly withheld any amounts due to the employee related to the employer's obligations under RCW 19.05.030, the department shall investigate and otherwise enforce the complaint as an alleged violation of a wage payment requirement, as defined in RCW 49.48.082.

(2) During an investigation, if the department discovers information suggesting additional violations of impermissibly withheld amounts due to the employees related to the employer's obligations under RCW 19.05.030, the department may investigate and take appropriate enforcement action without any additional complaint. The department may also initiate an investigation on behalf of one or more employees for any such violation when the director otherwise has reason to believe that a violation has occurred or will occur.

(3) The department may conduct a consolidated investigation for any alleged withheld amounts due to the employees related to the employer's obligations under RCW 19.05.030 when there are common questions of law or fact involving the employees. If the department consolidates such matters into a single investigation, it shall provide notice to the employer.

(4) The department may, for the purposes of enforcing this section, issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses or parties and the production of documents, administer oaths and examine witnesses under oath, take depositions, and seek affidavits or other verifications. The department may require the employer perform a self-audit of any records. The results or conclusions of the self-audit must be provided to the department within a reasonable time. The department must specify the timelines in the self-audit request. The records examined by the employer in order to perform the self-audit must be made available to the department upon request.

(5) Any citation or determination of compliance issued under this section is subject to RCW 49.48.083, 49.48.084, 49.48.085, and 49.48.086.

[ 2024 c 327 s 9.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—2024 c 327: See note following RCW 19.05.020.